Hawaii statutes.
§11-423 Voluntary expenditure
limits; filing affidavit. (a) Any candidate may voluntarily agree to
limit the candidate's expenditures and those of the candidate's candidate
committee or committees and the candidate's party on the candidate's behalf by filing
an affidavit with the campaign spending commission.

(b) The affidavit shall state that the
candidate knows the voluntary campaign expenditure limitations as set out in
this part and that the candidate is voluntarily agreeing to limit the candidate's
expenditures and those made on the candidate's behalf by the amount set by
law. The affidavit shall be subscribed to by the candidate and notarized and
filed no later than the time of filing nomination papers with the chief
election officer or county clerk.

(c) The affidavit shall remain effective until
the termination of the candidate committee or the opening of filing of
nomination papers for the next succeeding election, whichever occurs first. An
affidavit filed under this section may not be rescinded.

(d) From January 1 of the year of any primary,
special, or general election, the aggregate expenditures for each election by a
candidate who voluntarily agrees to limit campaign expenditures, inclusive of
all expenditures made or authorized by the candidate alone, all treasurers, the
candidate committee, and noncandidate committees on the candidate's behalf,
shall not exceed the following amounts expressed, respectively multiplied by
the number of voters in the last preceding general election registered to vote
in each respective voting district:

(1) For the office of governor — $2.50;

(2) For the office of lieutenant governor — $1.40;

(3) For the office of mayor — $2.00;

(4) For the offices of state senator, state
representative, county council member, and prosecuting attorney — $1.40; and

(5) For all other offices — 20 cents. [L 2010, c 211,
pt of §2; am L 2011, c 5, §5; am L 2013, c 63, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next